Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 22 Clinical Laboratories

31-22-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Certified” means certified by or operating under a certificate of waiver from the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services pursuant to the federal Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments of 1988.

“Clinical laboratory” means a facility for the biological, microbiological, serological, chemical, immunohematological, hematological, biophysical, cytological, pathological, or other examination of materials derived from the human body for the diagnosis of, recommendation of treatment of, or for the purposes of providing information for the diagnosis, prevention, or treatment of any disease or impairment of, or the assessment of the health of human beings.

History.

Ga. L. 1970, p. 531, § 2; Ga. L. 1971, p. 247, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1081, §§ 1, 2, 6, 7; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 31; Ga. L. 1991, p. 349, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 1190, § 1/SB 51; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-5/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 4-16/HB 214; Ga. L. 2016, p. 318, § 1/SB 273; Ga. L. 2017, p. 547, § 1/HB 210; Ga. L. 2021, p. 472, § 1/HB 93.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in the middle of the first sentence of paragraph (2), deleted “shall include” preceding “blood banks”, and substituted “unless such human blood and its component parts are intended as source material for the manufacture of biological products and regulated by the Center for Biologics Evaluation and Research (CBER) within the federal Food and Drug Administration; the term ‘clinical laboratory’ shall include” for “as well as”.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, rewrote this Code section.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-22-2.
Certification of clinical laboratories.

No clinical laboratory shall be operated in this state unless it is certified.

History.

Ga. L. 1970, p. 531, § 4; Ga. L. 1975, p. 737, § 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1081, §§ 3, 4, 8, 9; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2010, p. 838, § 10/SB 388; Ga. L. 2021, p. 472, § 1/HB 93.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, rewrote this Code section.

31-22-3.
[Reserved] Clinical Laboratory, Blood Bank, and Tissue Bank Committee.

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1132, § 2/SB 407, effective July 1, 2012; Ga. L. 2021.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was based on Ga. L. 1970, p. 531, § 8; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1257, §§ 3-5; Ga. L. 1982, p. 2376, §§ 1, 2.

Ga. L. 2021, p. 472, § 1/HB 93, reenacted the reservation of this Code section without change, effective July 1, 2021.

Law reviews.

For article, “Reforming Regenerative Medicine Regulation,” see 34 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 631 (2018).

31-22-4.
[Reserved] Examination of human specimens.

History.

Ga. L. 1970, p. 531, § 5; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 31; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1385, § 1; repealed by Ga. L. 2021, p. 472, § 1/HB 93, effective July 1, 2021.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2021, p. 472, § 1/HB 93 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2021.

31-22-5.
[Reserved] Methods for selection of blood donors and collection, storage, and processing of human blood.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 1247, § 2; repealed by Ga. L. 2021, p. 472, § 1/HB 93, effective July 1, 2021.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2021, p. 472, § 1/HB 93 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2021.

31-22-6.
Power of board to promulgate rules and regulations.

In addition to powers conferred elsewhere in this chapter, the board shall promulgate rules and regulations for the implementation of this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1970, p. 531, § 4; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1257, § 2; Ga. L. 2012, p. 1132, § 3/SB 407; Ga. L. 2021, p. 472, § 1/HB 93.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted the present provisions of this Code section for the former provisions, which read: “In addition to powers conferred elsewhere in this chapter, the board shall:

“(1) Promulgate rules and regulations for the implementation of this chapter;

“(2) Establish and enforce standards governing the safety and sanitary requirements pertaining to clinical laboratories to the extent that they are not otherwise subject to requirements imposed by law or municipal ordinance; and

“(3) Promulgate rules and regulations relating to the qualifications and performance of all personnel.”

31-22-7.
Reports to department.

The department shall require reporting by clinical laboratories of evidence of such infectious diseases as the department may specify and shall furnish forms for such reporting. No clinical laboratory making reports shall be held liable for having violated a trust or confidential relationship. The reports submitted shall be deemed confidential and not subject to public inspection.

History.

Ga. L. 1970, p. 531, § 6; Ga. L. 2021, p. 472, § 1/HB 93.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, deleted the subsection (a) designation, and deleted former subsection (b), which read: “Every director of a clinical laboratory shall report to the department such information regarding the operation of the clinical laboratory as the department by its rules and regulations may require in order to aid in the proper administration of this chapter.”

31-22-8.
[Reserved] Inspections; evaluation program.

History.

Ga. L. 1970, p. 531, § 7; Ga. L. 1975, p. 737, § 3; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1081, §§ 5, 10; repealed by Ga. L. 2021, p. 472, § 1/HB 93, effective July 1, 2021.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2021, p. 472, § 1/HB 93 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2021.

31-22-9.
[Reserved] Applicability of chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1970, p. 531, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1247, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1257, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 737, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1362, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 31; Ga. L. 2000, p. 226, § 1; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 31/HB 142; Ga. L. 2018, p. 355, § 1/SB 422; repealed by Ga. L. 2021, p. 472, § 1/HB 93, effective July 1, 2021.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2021, p. 472, § 1/HB 93 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2021.

31-22-9.1.
HIV tests; who may perform test.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“AIDS” means acquired immunodeficiency syndrome or AIDS related complex within the reporting criteria of the department.

“AIDS confidential information” means information which discloses that a person:

Has been diagnosed as having AIDS;

Has been or is being treated for AIDS;

Has been determined to be infected with HIV;

Has submitted to an HIV test;

Has had a positive or negative result from an HIV test;

Has sought and received counseling regarding AIDS; or

Has been determined to be a person at risk of being infected with HIV,

and which permits the identification of that person.

“AIDS transmitting crime” means any of the following offenses specified in Title 16:

Rape;

Sodomy;

Aggravated sodomy;

Child molestation;

Aggravated child molestation;

Prostitution;

Solicitation of sodomy;

Incest;

Statutory rape; or

Any offense involving a violation of Article 2 of Chapter 13 of Title 16, regarding controlled substances, if that offense involves heroin, cocaine, derivatives of either, or any other controlled substance in Schedule I, II, III, IV, or V and that other substance is commonly intravenously injected, as determined by the regulations of the department.

“Body fluids” means blood, semen, or vaginal secretions.

“Confirmed positive HIV test” means the results of at least two separate types of HIV tests, both of which indicate the presence of HIV in the substance tested thereby.

“Counseling” means providing the person with information and explanations medically appropriate for that person which may include all or part of the following: accurate information regarding AIDS and HIV; an explanation of behaviors that reduce the risk of transmitting AIDS and HIV; an explanation of the confidentiality of information relating to AIDS diagnoses and HIV tests; an explanation of information regarding both social and medical implications of HIV tests; and disclosure of commonly recognized treatment or treatments for AIDS and HIV.

“Determined to be infected with HIV” means having a confirmed positive HIV test or having been clinically diagnosed as having AIDS.

“Health care facility” means any:

Institution or medical facility, as defined in Code Section 31-7-1;

Facility for mentally ill persons or persons with developmental disabilities, as such terms are defined in Code Section 37-1-1, or alcoholic or drug dependent persons, as defined in Code Section 37-7-1;

Medical, dental, osteopathic, or podiatric clinic;

Hospice, as defined in Code Section 31-7-172;

Clinical laboratory, as defined in Code Section 31-22-1; or

Administrative, clerical, or support personnel of any legal entity specified in subparagraphs (A) through (E) of this paragraph.

“Health care provider” means any of the following persons licensed or regulated by the state:

Physician or physician assistant;

Osteopath;

Podiatrist;

Midwife;

Dentist, dental technician, or dental hygienist;

Respiratory care professional, certified respiratory therapy technician, or registered respiratory therapist;

Registered nurse;

Licensed practical nurse;

Emergency medical technician, paramedic, or cardiac technician;

Clinical laboratory director, supervisor, technician, or technologist;

Funeral director or embalmer;

Member of a hospice team, as defined in Code Section 31-7-172;

Nursing home administrator;

Professional counselor, social worker, or marriage and family therapist;

Psychologist;

Administrative, clerical, or support personnel, whether or not they are licensed or regulated by the state, of any person specified in subparagraphs (A) through (O) of this paragraph;

Trainee, student, or intern, whether or not they are licensed or regulated by the state, of any persons listed in subparagraphs (A) through (O) of this paragraph; or

First responder, as defined in Chapter 11 of this title, although such person is not licensed or regulated by the state.

“HIV” means any type of human immunodeficiency virus, human T-cell lymphotropic virus types III or IV, lymphadenopathy associated virus types I or II, AIDS related virus, or any other identified causative agent of AIDS.

“HIV infected person” means a person who has been determined to be infected with HIV, whether or not that person has AIDS, or who has been clinically diagnosed as having AIDS.

“HIV test” means any antibody, antigen, viral particle, viral culture, or other test to indicate the presence of HIV in the human body.

“Institutional care facility” means any:

Health care facility;

Child welfare agency, as defined in Code Section 49-5-12;

Group-care facility, as defined in Code Section 49-5-3;

Penal institution; or

Military unit.

“Knowledge of being infected with HIV” means actual knowledge of:

A confirmed positive HIV test; or

A clinical diagnosis of AIDS.

“Law” means federal or state law.

“Legal entity” means a partnership, association, joint venture, trust, governmental entity, public or private corporation, health care facility, institutional care facility, or any other similar entity.

“Military unit” means the smallest organizational unit of the organized militia of the state, as defined in Code Section 38-2-2, or of any branch of the armed forces of the United States, which unit is commanded by a commissioned officer.

“Penal institution” means any jail, correctional institution, or similar facility for the detention of violators of state laws or local ordinances.

“Person” means a natural person.

“Person at risk of being infected with HIV” means any person who may have already come in contact with or who may in the future reasonably be expected to come in contact with the body fluids of an HIV infected person.

“Physician” means any person licensed to practice medicine under Chapter 34 of Title 43.

“Public safety agency” means that governmental unit which directly employs a public safety employee.

“Public safety employee” means an emergency medical technician, firefighter, law enforcement officer, or prison guard, as such terms are defined in Code Section 45-9-81, relating to indemnification of such personnel for death or disability.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Code Sections 31-22-10 and 31-22-11, no person or legal entity, other than an insurer authorized to transact business in this state, shall submit for an HIV test any human body fluid or tissue to any person or legal entity except to:

A clinical laboratory that is certified; or

A clinical laboratory licensed as such pursuant to the laws of any other state.

No person or legal entity may sell or offer for sale any HIV test that permits any person or legal entity, including the person whose body fluids are to be tested, to perform that test other than a person or legal entity specified in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subsection (b) of this Code section; provided, however, that this shall not apply to the sale or offer of sale of an HIV test that has been cleared or approved for home use by the federal Food and Drug Administration.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-22-9.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 1799, § 8; Ga. L. 1989, p. 14, § 31; Ga. L. 2002, p. 660, § 4; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1259, § 11; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, §§ 1-4, 3-5/HB 228; Ga. L. 2009, p. 859, § 3/HB 509; Ga. L. 2011, p. 337, § 10/HB 324; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214; Ga. L. 2016, p. 752, § 3/HB 1058; Ga. L. 2021, p. 472, § 1/HB 93; Ga. L. 2022, p. 663, § 7/SB 164.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted “HIV” for “AIDS” in subparagraph (a)(2)(G); substituted “conducted by a certified clinical laboratory” for “approved for such purposes by the regulations of the department” at the end of subparagraph (a)(12); substituted “Code Sections 31-22-10 and 31-22-11” for “Code Section 31-21-10 and Code Section 31-22-11” in subsection (b); substituted “that is certified; or” for “licensed under this chapter” in paragraph (b)(1); deleted former paragraph (b)(2), which read: “A clinical laboratory exempt from licensure under Code Section 31-22-9; or”; redesignated former paragraph (b)(3) as present paragraph (b)(2); and substituted “paragraphs (1) and (2) of subsection (b) of this Code section; provided, however, that this shall not apply to the sale or offer of sale of an HIV test that has been cleared or approved for home use by the federal Food and Drug Administration” for “paragraphs (1) through (3) of subsection (b) of this Code section” at the end of subsection (c).

The 2022 amendments.

The first 2022 amendment, effective May 2, 2022, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised language and punctuation in paragraphs (a)(1), (a)(10), and (a)(13). The second 2022 amendment, effective July 1, 2022, substituted the present provisions of paragraph (a)(12) for the former provisions, which read: “‘HIV test’ means any antibody, antigen, viral particle, viral culture, or other test to indicate the presence of HIV in the human body, which test has been conducted by a certified clinical laboratory.”.

Cross references.

Confidential nature of AIDS information, §

24-12-20

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1988, p. 1799, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides:
“The General Assembly finds that Acquired Immunodeficiency Syndrome (AIDS) and its causative agent, including Human Immunodeficiency Virus (HIV), pose a grave threat to the health, safety, and welfare of the people of this state.
In the absence of any effective vaccination or treatment for this disease, it threatens almost certain death to all who contract it.
The disease is largely transmitted through sexual contacts and intravenous drug use, not through casual contact, and, while deadly, is therefore preventable. The key component of the fight against AIDS is education. Through public education and counseling our citizens can learn how the disease is transmitted and, thus, how to protect themselves and prevent its spread.
The Department of Human Resources is encouraged to continue its efforts to educate all Georgians about the disease, its causative agent, and its means of transmission.
In addition, voluntary testing should be encouraged for anyone who feels at risk of infection. While education, counseling, and voluntary testing are vital to the elimination of this epidemic, other measures are needed to protect the health of our citizens, and it is the intention of the General Assembly to enact such measures in the exercise of its police powers in order to deal with AIDS and HIV infection.”

Ga. L. 2022, p. SB 164, § 7/SB 164 purported to amend paragraph (a)(12) by deleting “, which test has been approved for such purposes by the regulations of the department”; however, the provisions actually read: “, which test has been conducted by a certified clinical laboratory”.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1988, “counselor, social worker, or marriage and family therapist” was substituted for “counselors, social workers, or marriage and family therapists” in subparagraph (a)(9)(N) and “Trainee, student, or intern” was substituted for “Trainees, students, or interns” in subparagraph (a)(9)(Q).

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-22-9.2.
HIV tests — Report of positive results; notification; counseling; violations; exception for insurance coverage; exposure of health care provider.

Any term used in this Code section and defined in Code Section 31-22-9.1 shall have the meaning provided for that term in Code Section 31-22-9.1.

Reserved.

Unless exempted under this Code section, each health care provider who orders an HIV test for any person shall do so only after notifying the person to be tested. Unless exempted under this subsection, the person to be tested shall have the opportunity to refuse the test. The provisions of this subsection shall not be required if the person is required to submit to an HIV test pursuant to Code Section 15-11-603, 17-10-15, 31-17A-3, 42-5-52.1, or 42-9-42.1. The provisions of this subsection shall not be required if the person is a minor or incompetent and the parent or guardian thereof permits the test after compliance with this subsection. The provisions of this subsection shall not be required if the person is unconscious, temporarily incompetent, or comatose and the next of kin permits the test after compliance with this subsection. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to emergency or life-threatening situations. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply if the physician ordering the test is of the opinion that the person to be tested is in such a medical or emotional state that disclosure of the test would be injurious to the person’s health. The provisions of this subsection shall only be required prior to drawing the body fluids required for the HIV test and shall not be required for each test performed upon that fluid sample.

The health care provider ordering an HIV test shall provide medically appropriate counseling to the person tested with regard to the test results. Such medically appropriate counseling shall only be required when the last confirmatory test has been completed.

The criminal penalty provided in Code Section 31-22-13 shall not apply to a violation of subsection (c), (d), or (g) of this Code section. The statute of limitations for any action alleging a violation of this Code section shall be two years from the date of the alleged violation.

The provisions of this Code section shall not apply to situations in which an HIV test is ordered or required in connection with insurance coverage, provided that the person to be tested or the appropriate representative of that person has agreed to have the test administered under such procedures as may be established by the Commissioner of Insurance after consultation with the Department of Community Health.

Notwithstanding the other provisions of this Code section, when exposure of a health care provider to any body fluids of a patient occurs in such a manner as to create any risk that such provider might become an HIV infected person if the patient were an HIV infected person, according to current infectious disease guidelines of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention or according to infectious disease standards of the health care facility where the exposure occurred, a health care provider otherwise authorized to order an HIV test shall be authorized to order any HIV test on such patient and obtain the results thereof:

If the patient or the patient’s representative, if the patient is a minor, otherwise incompetent, or unconscious, does not refuse the test after being notified that the test is to be ordered; or

If the patient or the patient’s representative refuses the test, following compliance with paragraph (1) of this subsection, when at least one other health care provider who is otherwise authorized to order an HIV test concurs in writing to the testing and the patient is informed of the results of the test and is provided counseling with regard to those results.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-22-9.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 1799, § 8; Ga. L. 1990, p. 705, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 2000, p. 20, § 20; Ga. L. 2006, p. 72, § 31/SB 465; Ga. L. 2007, p. 173, § 2/HB 429; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2013, p. 294, § 4-43/HB 242; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1346, § 2/HB 436; Ga. L. 2016, p. 752, § 4/HB 1058; Ga. L. 2018, p. 1112, § 31/SB 365; Ga. L. 2021, p. 472, § 1/HB 93.

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 8, 2018, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, deleted “31-17-4.2,” following “17-10-15,” in the third sentence of subsection (c).

Cross references.

HIV pregnancy screening, §

31-17-4.2

.

Control of HIV, T. 31, C. 17A.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2004, subsection (b) was reserved.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1988, p. 1799, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides:
“The General Assembly finds that Acquired Immunodeficiency Syndrome (AIDS) and its causative agent, including Human Immunodeficiency Virus (HIV), pose a grave threat to the health, safety, and welfare of the people of this state.
In the absence of any effective vaccination or treatment for this disease, it threatens almost certain death to all who contract it.
The disease is largely transmitted through sexual contacts and intravenous drug use, not through casual contact, and, while deadly, is therefore preventable. The key component of the fight against AIDS is education. Through public education and counseling our citizens can learn how the disease is transmitted and, thus, how to protect themselves and prevent its spread.
The Department of Human Resources is encouraged to continue its efforts to educate all Georgians about the disease, its causative agent, and its means of transmission.
In addition, voluntary testing should be encouraged for anyone who feels at risk of infection. While education, counseling, and voluntary testing are vital to the elimination of this epidemic, other measures are needed to protect the health of our citizens, and it is the intention of the General Assembly to enact such measures in the exercise of its police powers in order to deal with AIDS and HIV infection.”

Former subsection (b) was repealed by its own terms effective December 31, 2003.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 294, § 5-1/HB 242, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2014, and shall apply to all offenses which occur and juvenile proceedings commenced on and after such date. Any offense occurring before January 1, 2014, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such offense and shall be considered a prior adjudication for the purpose of imposing a disposition that provides for a different penalty for subsequent adjudications, of whatever class, pursuant to this Act. The enactment of this Act shall not affect any prosecutions for acts occurring before January 1, 2014, and shall not act as an abatement of any such prosecutions.”

Ga. L. 2021, p. 472, § 1/HB 93, reenacted this Code section without change, effective July 1, 2021.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Medical or life-style questions on applications and underwriting guidelines affecting AIDS and ARC, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Comptroller General, Commissioner of Insurance, Subject 120-2-43.

Law reviews.

For note on 1990 amendment of this Code section, see 7 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 312 (1990).

For comment, “AIDS: Balancing the Physician’s Duty to Warn and Confidentiality Concerns,” see 38 Emory L.J. 280 (1989).

31-22-10.
Effect of this chapter on Chapter 23 of this title and Article 6 of Chapter 5 of Title 44.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be deemed or construed as affecting or repealing Chapter 23 of this title or Article 6 of Chapter 5 of Title 44.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 1247, § 3; Ga. L. 2021, p. 472, § 1/HB 93.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2021, p. 472, § 1/HB 93, reenacted this Code section without change, effective July 1, 2021.

31-22-11.
Effect of this chapter on Chapter 34 of Title 43.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be deemed or construed as affecting or repealing Chapter 34 of Title 43.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 1257, § 6; Ga. L. 2021, p. 472, § 1/HB 93.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2021, p. 472, § 1/HB 93, reenacted this Code section without change, effective July 1, 2021.

31-22-12.
Injunction of operation of clinical laboratories not certified.

The operation or maintenance of a clinical laboratory that is not certified, in violation of this chapter, is declared a nuisance, inimical to the public health, welfare, and safety. The commissioner of the Department of Community Health in the name of the people of the state through the Attorney General may, in addition to other remedies provided in this chapter, bring an action for an injunction to restrain such violation or to enjoin the future operation or maintenance of any such clinical laboratory until compliance with this chapter or the rules or regulations promulgated under this chapter has been demonstrated to the satisfaction of the Department of Community Health.

History.

Ga. L. 1970, p. 531, § 10; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 31; Ga. L. 2021, p. 472, § 1/HB 93; Ga. L. 2022, p. 352, § 31/HB 1428.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted “of a clinical laboratory that is not certified,” for “of an unlicensed clinical laboratory” in the first sentence; and, in the second sentence, inserted “of the Department of Community Health” near the beginning and substituted “Department of Community Health” for “department” at the end.

The 2022 amendment,

effective May 2, 2022, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised punctuation in the first sentence of this Code section.

31-22-13.
Penalty.

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter or any of the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant thereto shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1970, p. 531, § 9; Ga. L. 2021, p. 472, § 1/HB 93.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2021, p. 472, § 1/HB 93, reenacted this Code section without change, effective July 1, 2021.